District of Columbia statutes.
31-4601

Violations.

Any person, partnership, or company who violates any of the provisions of this subdivision, or fails to comply with any duty imposed upon him or it by any provision of this subdivision, for which violation or failure no penalty is elsewhere provided by the laws of the District, shall be fined not exceeding $500 for each and every violation. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subdivision for which no penalty is provided elsewhere, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subdivision, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subdivision shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1176, ch. 672, ch. VI, § 1
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 456, 32 DCR 4450
Application of chapter to existing companies, see § 31-4420.
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-801.
1973 Ed., § 35-801.